Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

31-30.5-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and determines that police officers, in saving and protecting the lives and property of the citizens and residents of the state of Colorado, are performing state duties and are rendering services of special benefit to this state and that it is the province, right, and obligation of the state of Colorado to care for members of the police force who are entitled to retirement because of length of service or old age or because they have been injured or disabled in service and also to care for the spouses, dependent parents, and dependent children of such police officers.

The general assembly further finds and determines that the establishment of firefighters' pension plans in this state is a matter of statewide concern that affects the public safety and general welfare.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 856, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-301.

31-30.5-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Affiliated board" means any board affiliated, as specified in section 31-31-701, with the fire and police pension association created in section 31-31-201.

(1.5) "Board" means the board of trustees established as the governing body of the firefighters' or police officers' old hire pension fund as provided in sections 31-30.5-202 and 31-30.5-203.

"Employer" means any municipality in this state offering police or fire protection service employing one or more members and any special district or county improvement district in this state offering fire protection service employing one or more members.

"Fund" means the applicable firefighters or police officers' pension fund created in section 31-30.5-201.

"Member" means an active employee who is a full-time salaried employee of a municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district normally serving at least one thousand six hundred hours in any calendar year and whose duties are directly involved with the provision of police or fire protection, as certified by the employee's employer. The term does not include clerical or other personnel whose services are auxiliary to police or fire protection.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 857, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2009:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, (HB 09-1030), ch. 16, p. 89, § 2, effective August 5.

31-30.5-103. Applicability.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, every employer in this state shall provide the applicable pension benefits of the old hire police or fire pension plan established by this article for members hired on or before April 7, 1978.

In addition to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), every employer in this state shall provide the applicable pension benefits of the old hire police or fire pension plan established by this article for members hired on or after April 8, 1978, but before January 1, 1980, if:

The member has prior service as a firefighter or police officer in the state of Colorado;

The current employer approved coverage under its old hire pension plan or any other local plan;

The member contributed to the old hire pension fund of the current employer the amount of money that the member would have paid if all the member's prior service had been as an employee of the current employer, such makeup contribution to have been paid over a three-year period; and

The member requested such coverage, in writing, on or before December 31, 1981.

The following members, otherwise eligible to participate in an old hire pension plan pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be exempt from participation:

Members covered under an exempt pension plan established by part 8 of this article;

Members who, pursuant to the affiliation of their old hire pension plan with the fire and police pension association as provided by section 31-31-701, elect to become covered under the provisions of the statewide defined benefit plan, established by article 31 of this title; and

Members covered under the federal "Social Security Act", unless their employer also provides supplemental retirement benefits under an old hire pension plan.

All members meeting the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, who are not otherwise excluded from an old hire pension plan coverage under subsection (2) of this section, shall be referred to in this article and article 31 of this title as "old hire members".

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 857, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2014:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 14-031), ch. 52, p. 247, § 8, effective March 20.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1003.